Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 15 Teachers’ Pensions

16-15-1 — 16-15-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1907, ch. 1468, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 69, §§ 1, 2, 4, 5; P.L. 1909, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1090, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1213, § 1; P.L. 1917, ch. 1500, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2053, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2054, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2182, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 72, §§ 1 through 6; P.L. 1926, ch. 776, § 1; P.L. 1931, ch. 1707, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2507, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 195, §§ 1 through 7; P.L. 1939, ch. 693, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1717, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1948, ch. 2102, § 4; P.L. 1948, ch. 2129, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2130, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; P.L. 1952, ch. 3000, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3462, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §§

16-15-1

through

16-15-1

2; P.L. 1958, ch. 208, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 47; P.L. 1989, ch. 403, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. II, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

16-15-13.
Additional pension and retirement grants — Declaration of policy.

The state pension systems for teachers of public education have proved to be inadequate to meet the special needs of retirement during this period of sharply increasing costs of living. A completely adequate retirement system for teachers is an essential responsibility of the state in providing sound public education. Therefore, §§

16-15-13

to

16-15-15

are designed to provide additional state aid for retired teachers in order to make the teaching profession more attractive to qualified teachers and to provide for the security and welfare of education in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 124, § 1.

16-15-14.
Annual grant for teachers retiring after July 1, 1949.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum sufficient to pay an additional annual retirement grant of four hundred dollars ($400) per year for a payment of a pension of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) annually to every retired teacher who qualified for either a pension or retirement benefits under the provisions of this chapter.

It shall also annually appropriate a sum sufficient to pay an additional pension grant which when added to the existing pension will provide a maximum annual pension of two thousand dollars ($2,000) to any retired teacher on an ordinary disability pension who has twenty (20) or more years of teaching service credit in the retirement system and to any retired teacher under the maximum plan who has twenty (20) or more years of teaching service credit in the retirement system who retired after July 1, 1949, and whose present annual pension under the provisions of chapter 16 of this title is less than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

This grant shall be an annual state grant and shall be in addition to any and all amounts being paid from any state pension or retirement system and in addition to any payments from a retirement or pension system of any city or town.

All money appropriated in accordance with the amended provisions of this chapter for the retired teachers shall be administered by the department of elementary and secondary education, and all money appropriated in accordance with the amended provisions of chapter 16 of this title for the retired teachers shall be administered by the retirement division in the department of treasury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 124, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 274, § 2.

16-15-14.1.
Additional retirement grants for state college and school teachers — Payment.

The general assembly shall also annually appropriate a sum sufficient to pay an additional retirement grant which when added to the existing pension will provide for the payment of a pension of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) annually to every retired teacher who qualified for and is receiving retirement benefits for teaching at Rhode Island College, the University of Rhode Island, or other state schools whose present annual pension is less than two thousand dollars ($2,000). This additional grant shall be an annual state grant and shall be in addition to any and all amounts being paid from the state pension or retirement system and shall be administered by the retirement division in the department of treasury.

These grants shall be apportioned into monthly benefits and shall be disbursed monthly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 274, § 3.

16-15-15.
Payment of grants for teachers retiring after July 1, 1949.

Upon the passage of §§

16-15-13

—

16-15-15

the department of elementary and secondary education and the retirement division in the department of treasury shall apportion the retirement grant into monthly benefits and shall disburse monthly the benefits to all eligible retired teachers under this law.

The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of those sums that may be required from time to time upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the department of elementary and secondary education and the retirement division in the department of treasury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 124, § 3.

16-15-16.
Annual grant for teachers retiring prior to July 1, 1949.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum sufficient to pay an additional annual retirement grant of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for a payment of a pension of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) annually to every retired teacher who qualified for either a pension or retirement benefits under the provisions of this chapter, and who retired prior to July 1, 1949.

This grant shall be an annual state grant and shall be in addition to any and all amounts being paid from any state pension or retirement system and in addition to any payments from a retirement or pension system of any city or town.

All money appropriated in accordance with the amended provisions of this chapter for the retired teachers shall be administered by the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 114, § 2; P.L. 1972, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 227, § 1.

16-15-17.
Payment of grants for teachers retiring prior to July 1, 1949.

Upon the passage of this chapter the department of elementary and secondary education shall apportion the retirement grant into monthly benefits and shall disburse monthly benefits to all eligible retired teachers under this law.

The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of those sums that may be required from time to time upon receipt by the controller of proper vouchers approved by the department of elementary and secondary education and the retirement division in the department of treasury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 114, § 3.